Alabama, session 2026rs, HB115.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
45 Section 1. Sections 40-18-130, 40-18-131, 40-18-132,
46 and 40-18-133, Code of Alabama 1975, are designated as
47 Division 1 of Article 4A of Chapter 18 of Title 40, Code of
48 Alabama 1975.
49 Section 2. Section 40-18-133, Code of Alabama 1975, is
50 amended to read as follows:
51 "§40-18-133
52 (a) The Rural Physician Tax Credit, under Division 1 of
53 Article 4A, commencing with Section 40-18-130, Chapter 18, of
54 Title 40, is repealed terminated effective December 31, 2028,
55 unless extended by an act of the Legislature prior to that
56 date for no more than five additional years2026.
Page 2

date for no more than five additional years2026.
HB115 INTRODUCED
57 (b) The repealing termination of the incentives in
58 subsection (a) shall only affect the availability of the tax
59 credits after December 31, 2028 2026, and shall not cause a
60 reduction or suspension of any credits awarded on or prior to
61 December 31, 20262028.
62 Section 3. Division 2 of Article 4A, commencing with
63 Section 40-18-134, is added to Chapter 18 of Title 40, Code of
64 Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
65 Division 2.
66 §40-18-134
67 It is the intent of the Legislature to institute
68 programs that will make rural Alabama communities more
69 competitive in the recruitment and retention of physicians and
70 reduce inequities that rural communities have in the funding
71 and recruitment of physicians.
72 §40-18-134.1
73 For the purposes of this division, the following words
74 have the following meanings, respectively, unless the context
75 clearly indicates otherwise:
76 (1) PRACTICES MEDICINE. The practice of medicine or
77 osteopathy as defined in Section 34-24-50.
78 (2) RURAL COMMUNITY. According to the most recent
79 federal census, an area within a county having a population of
80 75,000 or less inhabitants, that is one of the following:
81 a. A municipality that has a population of 20,000 or
82 less inhabitants.
83 b. The unincorporated area of the county.
84 (3) RURAL PHYSICIAN. A physician licensed to practice
Page 3

(3) RURAL PHYSICIAN. A physician licensed to practice
HB115 INTRODUCED
85 medicine in Alabama who lives in a rural community and
86 practices medicine in a rural community.
87 §40-18-134.2
88 (a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), for tax
89 years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and ending
90 December 31, 2031, a physician qualifying as a rural physician
91 under this division shall be allowed a credit against the tax
92 imposed by Section 40-18-2, in the sum of ten thousand dollars
93 ($10,000) per tax year. The tax credit under this subdivision
94 may be claimed for not more than four tax years except as
95 provided in subdivision (2).
96 (2) No tax credit may be claimed under this division by
97 a physician who previously claimed a rural physician tax
98 credit under Division 1 prior to January 1, 2027, except a
99 physician who claimed a tax credit under Division 1 for less
100 than the five years authorized under Division 1 prior to
101 January 1, 2026, and who is otherwise eligible to claim a
102 credit under this division, may claim a tax credit under this
103 division for the remainder of the five-year credit period
104 previously authorized under Division 1.
105 (3) No tax credit shall be allowed under this division
106 by a physician who practiced in a rural community prior to
107 January 1, 2027, unless on or after January 1, 2027, the
108 physician returns to practice in a rural community after
109 having practiced in a large or urban community or outside of
110 Alabama for at least three years.
111 (b) Prior to claiming a credit under this division, a
112 rural physician shall submit to the Alabama Statewide Area
Page 4

rural physician shall submit to the Alabama Statewide Area
HB115 INTRODUCED
113 Health Education Center Program Office, or its successor,
114 adequate information to substantiate that he or she qualifies
115 for the income tax credit. The Alabama Statewide Area Health
116 Education Center Program Office, upon review of the
117 documentation from the rural physician, shall make the
118 determination whether the physician qualifies for the credit
119 and shall issue a certificate to the qualifying physician. The
120 certificate shall be submitted by the taxpayer at the time of
121 filing the return. Failure to submit the required certificate
122 to the Department of Revenue shall result in the automatic
123 denial of the credit.
124 (c) The Alabama Statewide Area Health Education Center
125 Program Office shall submit an annual informational report to
126 the Department of Revenue by January 31 of each year that
127 lists all taxpayer issued certificates with information
128 required by the department for credit certification.
129 (d) Effective for tax years beginning January 1, 2027,
130 and ending December 31, 2031, the Department of Revenue shall
131 file an annual informational report in accordance with Section
132 40-1-50, and rules adopted under that section, for physicians
133 who receive the credit under this division.
134 (e) The Department of Revenue shall adopt any rules
135 necessary to implement and administer this division.
136 (f) The Alabama Board of Medical Examiners shall assist
137 the Alabama Statewide Area Health Education Center Program
138 Office in verifying the eligibility of physicians applying for
139 the credit.
140 (g) The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
Page 5

(g) The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
HB115 INTRODUCED
141 Services shall consult with the Alabama Statewide Area Health
142 Education Center Program Office to develop performance metrics
143 and other measures of success to include in the annual report
144 required pursuant to subsection (d). During the 2031 fiscal
145 year, this incentive shall undergo an evaluation by the
146 Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of Services to determine
147 whether the program is impacting the determined measures of
148 success.
149 (h) The Alabama Commission on the Evaluation of
150 Services shall consult with the Alabama Statewide Area Health
151 Education Center Program Office to develop the appropriate
152 measures and methodology for conducting the needs assessment.
153 Section 4. This act shall become effective October 1,
154 2026.
Page 6